California statutes. Financial Code
The commissioner shall, upon receipt of written notification by an industrial loan company that it intends to engage in or is engaging in transactions permitted under Section 18209, make an examination of the affairs and records of each such industrial loan company at least once each year. Such examination shall be made or performed unless such company notifies the commissioner of its election to discontinue such activity and gives evidence that it has disposed of all evidences of indebtedness arising from any such transactions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18394.

Investigation and examination reports prepared by the commissioner’s duly designated representatives shall not be public records. Those reports may be disclosed to the officers and directors of a company that is the subject of a report for the purpose of corrective action by those officers or directors. That type of disclosure shall not operate as a waiver of the exemption specified in Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 110.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

18396.

(a) In this section, “governmental agency” includes, without limitation, any agency of this state, of any other state of the United States, of the United States, or of any foreign nation.

(b) The commissioner may furnish information to a governmental agency that regulates financial institutions.

(c) The commissioner may furnish to a governmental agency that administers a loan guarantee or similar program,
 information relating to a person who participates in the program.

(d) The commissioner may furnish to a governmental agency that regulates business activities, other than the type described in subdivision (b), information relating to:

(1) A suspected violation of a law administered by the agency.

(2) A person involved in an application to the agency for a license, approval, or other authorization.

(e) The commissioner may furnish to a governmental agency that is a law enforcement agency, information relating to a suspected crime.

(f) This section does not prescribe the only circumstances under which the commissioner may furnish information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reports and Financial Statements [18405. - 18412.]

18405.

(a) On or before the 15th day of March of every year, each industrial loan company shall file with the commissioner an audit report containing audited financial statements together with such other relevant information as the commissioner may require relating to the company and to each place of business of the company. The audited financial statements shall include a balance sheet of the company prepared as of the last day of the preceding calendar year and statements of income and of surplus for such calendar year.

(b) The reports and financial statements referred to in subdivision (a) shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and shall be accompanied by a report, certificate, or opinion of
 an independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant, and shall contain such relevant information as the commissioner may require. The audits shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and the rules and regulations of the commissioner.

(c) For good cause and upon written request, the commissioner may extend the time for compliance with subdivision (a).

(d) If the report, certificate, or opinion of the independent accountant referred to in subdivision (b) hereof is in any way qualified, the commissioner may require the company to take such action as he or she
 deems appropriate to permit an independent accountant to remove such qualification from the report, certificate, or opinion.

(e) The commissioner may reject any financial statement, report, certificate, or opinion filed pursuant to this section by notifying the company required to make such filing of its rejection and the cause thereof. Within 30 days after the receipt of such notice, the company shall correct such deficiency, and the failure so to do shall be deemed a violation of this division. The commissioner shall retain a copy of all filings so rejected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 190, Sec. 42.   (AB 1517)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18406.

Each industrial loan company which has issued and which has outstanding investment certificates shall:

(a) Post in a conspicuous and prominent place in each business location a condensed statement of its financial condition, and

(b) Furnish to a person prior to such person’s investment in an investment certificate a copy of its latest condensed statement of its financial condition. Each year a copy of the condensed statement shall be furnished by mail or hand-delivered to each investment certificate holder.

(c) Maintain and have available for public inspection a copy of its latest audited financial statement required by subdivision (a) of Section 18405 in each of its business locations. Any person shall, upon request, be permitted to inspect the statement during regular business hours.

(d) The statement required by subdivisions (a) and (b) shall set forth such information and be in such form as may be required by the commissioner.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18407.

An industrial loan company shall, when requested by the commissioner, submit its unaudited financial statements, prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and consisting of at least a balance sheet and a statement of income as of the date and for the period specified by the commissioner. The commissioner may require the submission of such reports on a monthly or other periodic basis.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18408.

An industrial loan company shall make other special reports to the commissioner as the commissioner may from time to time require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18409.

The commissioner shall make and file annually with the department as a public record a composite of reports filed by industrial loan companies, and any comments thereon that he or she deems in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 596.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

18410.

For the purposes of the composite report provided for by Section 18409, an industrial loan company shall furnish statistical information as is reasonably required by the commissioner, including information for each place of business of the company and as to any parent, subsidiary or affiliated company.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18411.

The commissioner may by rule or regulation specify the form and contents of the financial statements, reports, certificates and opinions required to be filed pursuant to this article, and may require that such reports and financial statements be verified in such manner as he may prescribe.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

18412.

Each report required under this article shall be filed with the commissioner at the time that the commissioner by regulation or order may require. If any industrial loan company fails to make any report required by this article at the time specified by the commissioner, or fails to include in that report any matter required by this article or by the commissioner, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day which that report is delayed or withheld by the failure or neglect of that industrial loan company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Possession, Conservatorship, and Liquidation by the Commissioner [18415. - 18425.17.]

18415.

The commissioner may take possession of the property and business of any industrial loan company and retain possession until the company resumes business or its affairs are liquidated if any of the following grounds exist:

(a) The capital of an industrial loan company is impaired.

(b) An industrial loan company has violated its articles of incorporation or any law of this state.

(c) An industrial loan company is conducting its business in an unsafe or
 unauthorized manner.

(d) An industrial loan company refuses to submit its books, papers and affairs to the inspection of any examiner.

(e) An officer of any industrial loan company refuses to be examined upon oath touching the concerns of such industrial loan company.

(f) An industrial loan company has suspended payment of its obligations.

(g) An industrial loan company is in such condition that it is unsound or unsafe for it to transact business.

(h) An industrial loan company neglects or refuses to observe any order of the commissioner made pursuant to this division, unless the enforcement of that order is restrained in a proceeding brought by the industrial loan company.

(i) An industrial loan company (1) fails to become and continue as either a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or a member of the Thrift Guaranty Corporation of California in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 18475), (2) has its right to participate in the Thrift Guaranty Corporation of California suspended or revoked pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 18496 and it is not a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or (3) fails to pay any assessment levied pursuant thereto within the time specified.

(j) A member industrial loan company of Guaranty Corporation refuses to permit Guaranty Corporation, its appointed certified public accountant or public accountant, or specialized committees or employees to fulfill their duties under Section 18496.

(k) An industrial loan
 company has sold or issued investment certificates in violation of the provisions of this division.

(l) An industrial loan company has failed to maintain in effect a bond required under the provisions of this division.

(m) Any fact or condition exists which, if it had existed at the time of the original application for authority to organize and establish a corporation to engage in the industrial loan business reasonably would have warranted the commissioner in disapproving the application.

(n) An application for membership in the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation has not been filed with and accepted by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation on or before January 15, 1990.

If the commissioner takes possession of the business and property of an industrial loan
 company, the company, with the consent of the commissioner, may resume business upon prescribed conditions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 583, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.1.

Whenever the commissioner has taken possession of the property and business of an industrial loan company, that industrial loan company, within 10 days after the taking, if it deems itself aggrieved thereby, may apply to the superior court in the county in which the head office of the industrial loan company is located to enjoin further proceedings. The commissioner may exercise all powers granted by this article during the 10-day period after taking possession of the property and business of the industrial loan company. The court, after citing the commissioner to show cause why further proceedings should not be enjoined and
 after a hearing and a determination of the facts upon the merits may dismiss the application or enjoin the commissioner from further proceedings and direct the commissioner to surrender the property and business to the industrial loan company, or make such further order as may be just.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.2.

An appeal may be taken from the judgment of the court by the commissioner or by the industrial loan company in the manner provided by law for appeals from the judgment of a superior court to the court of appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 149.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.3.

(a) Whenever the net worth of an industrial loan company, exclusive of its good will, is less than 90 percent of the aggregate sum of its outstanding investment certificates, exclusive of those hypothecated with the company issuing them, divided by the fraction that is its investment certificates ratio permitted by the commissioner, the commissioner shall by written order direct the company to make good the alleged deficiency of net worth. Pursuant to the commissioner’s orders, the company’s net worth shall be at least 100 percent of
 the aggregate sum of its outstanding investment certificates, exclusive of those hypothecated with the company issuing them, divided by the fraction that is its investment certificates ratio permitted by the commissioner.

(b) If the company fails to cure the alleged deficiency of net worth within the commissioner’s specified time, not to exceed 120 days, the commissioner may take possession of the company’s property and business. If the alleged deficiency is not cured within 120 days of the order, the commissioner shall take possession of the company’s property and business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 174.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.4.

The commissioner may also, upon the request of the board of directors of a company, take possession of the property and business of a company and as conservator, take such action as the commissioner deems proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.5.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of any industrial loan company, the commissioner shall give notice of that fact to all persons holding or having in their possession any assets of the company. The notice required by this section shall not be deemed to be a prerequisite to the taking of possession of the property and business of the industrial loan company. No person knowing of the taking, or who has been notified thereof, shall have a lien or charge upon any assets of the company for any payment, advance or clearance thereafter made, or for any liability thereafter incurred.

Notice is deemed given when the commissioner has either made personal service of the notice, or mailed the notice to the person by certified mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.6.

Any officer, agent, employee, director, or stockholder of a company who refuses to comply with the demand for possession issued under Section 18415 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment not exceeding one year or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.7.

On demand of the commissioner, it shall be the duty of the sheriff of any county of the state, and of the police department of any municipal corporation therein, to furnish the commissioner with deputies, patrolmen, or officers as may be necessary to assist the commissioner in making and enforcing any seizure under Section 18415.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.8.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of any company, the superior court for the county in which the head office of the company is located shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of all proceedings relating thereto and of any action or other proceedings brought under the provisions of this chapter. All papers relating to the taking of possession, including copies of the certificate of appointment of any special deputy, shall be filed and be made a part of the record of the proceeding within 45 days of the date of taking possession. All papers filed with the superior court, including inventories required to be
 filed, shall be made a part of the record of the proceeding without the payment of any additional fees therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.9.

At any time after the order taking possession issued under Section 18415 has been filed with the court, the commissioner may remove the principal office of the person proceeded against to the City and County of San Francisco or to the City of Los Angeles. In the event of removal, the court where the proceeding was commenced shall, upon the application of the commissioner, direct the superior court clerk to transmit all of the papers filed therein with that clerk to the Superior Court Clerk of the City and County of San Francisco or of the County of Los Angeles as the case may require. The proceeding shall thereafter be
 conducted in the same manner as though it had been commenced in the county to which it had been transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.10.

The commissioner may, at any time, examine under oath any officer, director, agent, employee or stockholder of a company to determine whether or not all property and assets have been transferred or delivered to the commissioner’s possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.11.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of any company, the commissioner has authority and the duty to collect all moneys due to the company and to do such other acts as are necessary or expedient to collect, conserve, or protect its assets, property and business. The commissioner shall also proceed to conserve or liquidate the affairs thereof as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.12.

The commissioner may file a petition with the court and the court shall issue such injunctions or orders, as may be deemed necessary, to prevent any of the following occurrences:

(a) Interference with the commissioner or the proceeding.

(b) The institution of any actions or proceedings, or the prosecution of any actions or proceedings already commenced.

(c) Waste of assets of the entity.

(d) The obtaining of preferences, judgments, attachments or other liens against the company or its assets.

(e) The making of any levy against the company or its assets.

(f) The sale or deed for nonpayment of taxes or assessments levied by any taxing agency of any of the following:

(1) Property owned by the company.

(2) Property upon which the company holds an encumbrance.

(3) Property upon which the company has prior thereto commenced an action to foreclose any deed of trust or mortgage or has exercised the power of sale under any trust deed or mortgage which sale or foreclosure proceedings have not yet been completed or upon which
 no trustee’s deed or judgment of court or sheriff’s certificate of sale has been issued.

“Taxing agency,” as used in this section, has the same meaning as defined in Section 121 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The injunctions or orders authorized by this subdivision may be modified, dissolved, or rescinded by the court on motion of the commissioner, the Controller, or the person charged with the collection of taxes or assessments on such property. The recording in the office of the county recorder of any county in the state of an order or injunction issued pursuant to this section, shall constitute service of the order or injunction upon any taxing agency with respect to property or interest therein located in such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.13.

After the taking of possession of the property and business of any company, the commissioner may terminate or adopt any executory contract to which the company may be a party, including leases of real or personal property. The termination or adoption shall be made within six months after obtaining knowledge of the existence of the contract or lease. Any provision in the contract or lease which provides for damages or cancellation fees upon termination shall not be binding on the commissioner or the company seized. The commissioner and the company shall only be liable for actual damages and in no event in excess of one
 thousand dollars ($1,000). Any claim must be filed within 30 days of the date of the termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.14.

The commissioner may proceed against any debtor or alleged debtor by way of summary procedure or by order to show cause issued by the court upon application by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.15.

The commissioner may make examinations of the seized company and review the activities of any conservator or liquidator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.16.

The actual cost of any examination, investigation or services, including the actual amount of salary or other compensation paid to the persons making the examination, investigation or rendering services and the overhead costs in connection therewith, as fixed by the commissioner, shall be paid out of the assets of the company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.17.

The determination by the commissioner to liquidate a company, evidenced by filing written notice of the determination with the court, operates to stay or dissolve all actions or attachments instituted or levied within 90 days next preceding the taking of possession of the company by the commissioner, and pending the process of liquidation, no attachment or execution shall be levied or lien created upon any of the property of the company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.18.

Upon taking possession of the property, and business of a company in any proceeding under this article, the commissioner shall have the power to do all of the following:

(a) Appoint one or more special deputy commissioners as his or her agent or agents with the powers specified in the certificate of appointment to assist in the duty of conservation or of liquidation and distribution.

(b) Employ the Attorney General as counsel or employ private counsel as may be deemed necessary to assist the
 commissioner in the performance of his or her duties under this chapter. Appointment of private counsel shall be made only with the consent of the Attorney General. The compensation of that counsel shall be fixed by the commissioner, subject to the approval of the court.

(c) Set the compensation of a special deputy commissioner.

(d) Require from each special deputy commissioner and from each assistant such security for the faithful performance of their duties as the commissioner may deem proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.19.

All expenses of taking possession of, conserving, conducting, liquidating, disposing of or otherwise dealing with the business and property of any company under this article shall be paid out of the assets of that company. Those expenses shall include, among other things, the compensation of special deputy commissioners, clerks and assistants and the actual cost of any services attributable to the conservatorship or liquidation performed by the commissioner and staff, including the actual amount of salary or compensation paid to the person performing the services and overhead costs in connection therewith as fixed by the
 commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.21.

Any transaction occurring within six months of the date of taking possession shall be voidable by the conservator or liquidator if the transaction has the effect of giving to, or enabling any creditor of, the company, any affiliate of the company, any officer, director, stockholder, employee or any relative thereof, to obtain a preference over any other creditor of the company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.22.

No obligation may be purchased or discounted under any agreement between the company and any person involving the purchase or discount of obligation from the person, with or without recourse, from the moment of taking possession pursuant to Section 18415. Any guarantees, recourse or repurchase agreements given at the time of purchase, or discount of any obligation prior to the date of taking possession, shall continue to be binding on the person. Any reserves, withholds or other security held by the company under the terms of the agreement shall be considered liabilities of the company in the general creditor classification
 and may not be used as offset against any obligation purchased or discounted under the agreement. No distribution of assets shall be made on these liabilities until the obligations purchased or discounted under the agreement have been satisfied.

In case of sale of the obligations by the liquidator, the reserves, withholds or other security shall remain as a liability to be paid off in the normal course of liquidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18415.23.

No attachment or execution shall be issued against the property of any company before final judgment in any action or proceeding in any court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18420.

The commissioner, as conservator or liquidator, after taking possession of the company, shall, in his or her name, in the name of the company, in the name of both, or otherwise, have authority to do all of the following:

(a) Collect all obligations and money due the company.

(b) Exercise and possess all the rights, powers and privileges of the company, its officers and directors.

(c) Institute, prosecute, maintain, defend, intervene, and
 otherwise participate in any and all actions, suits, or other legal proceedings by and against the conservator or liquidator or company, or in which the conservator, the company or its creditors or debtors, or any of them, have an interest, and in every way to represent the company, its creditors, and debtors.

(d) Execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all deeds, contracts, leases, assignments, bills of sale, releases, extensions, satisfactions, and other instruments necessary or proper for any purposes.

(e) Be the custodian of all moneys collected by the commissioner or coming into his or her possession in the course of any proceeding under this chapter, but he or she may deposit those moneys, or any part thereof, in a bank insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(f) Invest or reinvest such portions
 of funds and assets of the company, in a manner as he or she may deem suitable for the best interests of the creditors of the company.

(g) To revise, refinance, extend, or settle any loan or obligation upon those terms and conditions as he or she may deem to be most advantageous to the company.

(h) To sell, compound, compromise or assign for the purpose of collection upon those terms and conditions he or she deems best, any bad or doubtful debts due the company.

(i) To compound, compromise, or in any manner negotiate settlements of claims against the company upon those terms and conditions as he or she shall deem to be most advantageous to the company.

(j) To sell, acquire, hypothecate, encumber, lease, improve, abandon, or otherwise dispose of or deal
 with any real or personal property which has come into ownership of the company by way of repossession, foreclosure, execution, suit or by other such means on a basis of reasonable market value, without notice, for cash, on terms, or upon such other terms and conditions as he or she may deem proper.

(k) To settle, compromise, or obtain the release of, for cash or other consideration, claims and demands against the company or the conservator.

(l) To sell for cash or on terms, exchange, or otherwise dispose of, in whole or in part, any or all the assets and property of the company, real, personal, and mixed, tangible and intangible, of any nature.

(m) Execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all deeds, contracts, leases, assignments, bills of sale, releases, extensions, satisfactions, and any other instruments
 necessary or proper for any purposes, including, but not limited to, the effectuation, termination, or modification of any sale, lease, or transfer of real, personal, or mixed property, or that shall be necessary or proper to liquidate or carry on the business of the company. Any deed or other instrument executed pursuant to the authority hereby given shall be as valid and effectual for all purposes as if it had been executed as the act and deed of the company.

(n) Pay out and expend such sums as the commissioner deems necessary or advisable including the following:

(1) To pay off or discharge any taxes, assessments, liens, claims, or charges of any nature against the company, the conservator or liquidator, any asset or property of any nature of the company, or upon any asset or property on which the company or conservator or liquidator has an interest of a value of any nature.
 

(2) For or in connection with the preservation, maintenance, conservation, protection, remodeling, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of any asset or property of any nature of the company.

(3) To pay all costs and expenses of the conservatorship or liquidation and all costs of carrying out or exercising the commissioner’s rights, powers, privileges, and duties as conservator.

(4) To pay valid creditor obligations, interest owed on debts, debts incurred during conservatorship or liquidation and all other debts of the company or conservatorship or liquidation of any nature.

(5) To pay all costs and expenses in the operation of the conservatorship or liquidation of the company.

(o) Do
 such things, and have such rights, powers, privileges, immunities and duties, whether or not otherwise granted in this chapter, as shall be authorized, directed, conferred, or imposed from time to time in specific cases by order of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18420.1.

No transaction involving real or personal property, investment or reinvestment of funds or assets, or settlement or compromise of pending lawsuits shall be made without first obtaining permission of the court, and then only in accordance with such terms as the court may prescribe, when either of the following exist:

(a) The principal sum of any obligation due the company or settlement or compromise of a pending lawsuit exceeds the sum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(b) The market value of
 any real or personal property, except obligations due the company, exceeds the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18420.2.

The commissioner may, with ex parte approval of the court, sell all or any part of the company’s assets to another industrial loan company, to a bank, to a savings and loan association, to Guaranty Corporation, or to an instrumentality of the United States government. In like manner, the commissioner may borrow from Guaranty Corporation, an instrumentality of the United States government, or a private insurer which insures or guarantees the company’s investment certificates, any amount necessary to facilitate the assumption of investment certificate liabilities by a newly chartered or existing industrial loan company,
 assigning any part or all of the assets of the company as security for that loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18420.5.

The commissioner may appoint a person to act as conservator or liquidator of the company. The person appointed may be Thrift Guaranty Corporation of California. If the company’s outstanding thrift obligations are insured by an instrumentality of the United States government, the commissioner may appoint that instrumentality to act as conservator or liquidator of the company. Subject to the other provisions of this division, a conservator or liquidator, while in possession of the property and business of a company, has the same powers and rights and is subject to the same duties and obligations as the commissioner while in
 possession of the property and business of a company. During such time, the rights of the company and of all persons with respect thereto, subject to the other provisions of this chapter, are the same as if the commissioner had taken possession of such properties and business, except that the commissioner may limit those powers and rights as he or she may deem necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18420.6.

The commissioner shall have the authority to terminate the appointment of a conservator or liquidator whenever the commissioner deems it in the best interest of the company, its creditors, and investors. The commissioner shall file a copy of the notice of termination with the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18420.7.

The commissioner may require a conservator or liquidator to provide such bond as the commissioner deems proper. The conservator or liquidator shall receive a salary, fixed by the commissioner, in an amount no greater than that which would be paid by the commissioner to a special deputy commissioner in charge of the liquidation of the company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.

If at any time after taking possession of the property and business of a company it shall appear to the commissioner that it would be futile to proceed as conservator with the conduct of the business of the company, the commissioner may order the company to be liquidated. A copy of the liquidation order shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.1.

The liquidator shall cause notice to be given by publication for four successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation at or near the principal place of business in the state of the company, to all persons having claims against the company, other than investment certificate holders, whether or not an action is pending to enforce any claim for demand, requiring them to present and file their claims and make legal proof thereof at a place and within a time designated in the notice. The time shall not be less than 90 days after the first publication of the notice. The notice shall also state that all claims other than those
 of investment certificate holders appearing upon the books or records of the company and any claims, whether or not an action is pending to enforce any such claim or demand, shall be forever barred if not filed within the time designated. The liquidator shall also mail a similar notice to all persons whose names appear as creditors upon the books of the company and any person who has an action pending to enforce a claim or demand whose address appears upon the books or records of the company and shall enclose therewith a printed form or notice of claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.2.

All claims, demands, or causes of action of creditors, and persons other than investors against any property owned or held by it in trust, or otherwise, must be presented to the liquidator in writing, verified by the claimant, or someone on his or her behalf, within the period specified in the notice for the presentation of claims, whether or not an action is pending to enforce any such claim or demand. The liquidator shall not approve any claim not so presented, and any such claim, demand, or cause of action not so presented is forever barred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.3.

If the liquidator doubts the validity of any claim, the liquidator may reject the claim and serve notice of rejection upon the claimant either by certified mail or personally. A notice of rejection given by mail, addressed to the claimant at the address set forth in the claim, shall constitute sufficient notice of the rejection. Any action upon a claim so rejected must be brought within 30 days after the mailing of the notice or personal service of the notice in the court in which the liquidation proceeding is pending for an order to show cause why the claim should not be allowed. Failure to bring such action within 30 days to
 enforce the payment of or establish any rejected claim shall forever bar any such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.4.

A claim shall set forth, under oath, on the form prescribed by the commissioner, all of the following:

(a) The particulars of the claim, and the consideration for the claim.

(b) Whether the claim is secured or unsecured, and, if secured, the nature and amount of the security.

(c) The payments, if any, made thereon.

(d) That the sum claimed is justly owing from such person
 to the claimant.

(e) That there is no offset to the claim.

(f) Such other data or supporting documents as the liquidator requires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 140, Sec. 1.   Effective July 1, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

18425.5.

When an investment certificate holder is also a debtor, the liquidator may offset any balance due the investment certificate holder against the debt and the interest due on that debt up to the date of offset, in an amount not to exceed the amount of the debt or the amount of the thrift obligation guaranteed by the Thrift Guaranty Corporation of California, whichever is less.
